California statutes. Education Code
(o) The state match funding received by participating classified employees pursuant to this section shall not be considered compensation for purposes of determining retirement benefits for the California Public Employees’ Retirement System or the California State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(p) (1) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, the program shall be funded pursuant to Section 85 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2019.

(2) For the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the operation of this section shall be contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act
 or another statute.

(q) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or joint powers authority described in subdivision (a) of Section 41023 and formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) “Month” means 20 days or
 four weeks of 5 days each, including legal holidays.

(3) “Program” means the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program.

(4) “Regular assignment” means a classified employee’s employment during the academic school year, excluding the summer recess period.

(r) It is the intent of the Legislature that participating employees in this section include all classified employees, as defined in this chapter, including teacher assistants, that meet the specified program requirements.

(s) Commencing with the annual Budget Act for the 2023–24 fiscal year, and notwithstanding Section 1.80 of the annual Budget Act, the funds appropriated in Item 6100-220-0001 of the annual
 Budget Act shall be available for encumbrance during both the fiscal year in which the funds are appropriated and the immediately following fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 744, Sec. 5.5.   (SB 147)   Effective October 13, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, pursuant to Sec. 16 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 4. INSTRUCTION AND SERVICES [46000. - 65001.]



  PART 26. ATTENDANCE FOR COMPUTING APPORTIONMENTS [46000. - 46610.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [46000. - 46015.]



  ARTICLE 1. Records [46000. - 46000.]

46000.

Attendance in all schools and classes shall be recorded and kept according to regulations prescribed by the State Board of Education, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Absences [46010. - 46015.]

46010.

The total days of attendance of a pupil in the schools and classes maintained by a school district, or schools or classes maintained by the county superintendent of schools, during the fiscal year shall be the number of days school was actually taught for not less than the minimum schooldays during the fiscal year less the sum of the pupil’s absences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 12.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.1.

Commencing in the fall of the 1986–87 academic year, the governing board of each school district shall, each academic year, notify pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and the parents or guardians of all pupils enrolled in the district, that school authorities may excuse any pupil from the school for the purpose of obtaining confidential medical services without the consent of the pupil’s parent or guardian.

The notice required pursuant to this section may be included with any other notice given pursuant to this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   Effective June 27, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.2.

(a) For the purpose of determining “changes in enrollment” pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, as required by subdivision (d) of Section 41204, the total days of attendance by pupils in schools and classes maintained by a school district shall, in the 1997–98 fiscal year, be separately determined both as if subdivision (b) of Section 46010, as it read in the 1997–98 fiscal year, did and did not apply. The days of attendance figure resulting from the application of subdivision (b) of Section 46010 shall be used in calculating average daily attendance for comparison with average daily attendance in the 1996–97 fiscal year. The days of attendance figure determined without applying subdivision (b) of Section 46010 shall be used in calculating average daily attendance for comparison with average daily attendance in the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(b) For the purpose of determining “changes in enrollment” for the 2008–09 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, as required by subdivision (d) of Section 41204, the total days of attendance by pupils in schools and classes maintained by a school district, in the 2007–08 fiscal year, shall be separately determined both as if the California School Age Families Education Program (Cal-SAFE), as set forth in Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 54740) of Chapter 9 of Part 29, as it read on January 1, 2008, did and did not apply. The days of attendance figure resulting from the application of the Cal-SAFE program shall be used in calculating average daily attendance for comparison with average daily attendance in the 2006–07 fiscal year. The days of attendance figure determined without applying the Cal-SAFE program shall be used in calculating average daily attendance for comparison with average daily attendance in the 2008–09 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 20.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 46010 or any other provision of law, for purposes of calculating days of attendance in order to compute any apportionment of state funding under this code, a pupil enrolled in a regular day class, including opportunity classes and classes conducted in county community schools, for the minimum day that is applicable to that pupil is deemed to be present for the entire schoolday, unless he or she is absent for the entire schoolday. This section does not apply to any pupil whose attendance is required under this code, or under Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, to be recorded by clock hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 25.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46011.

Absences due to illness or quarantine shall be verified by the district or the county superintendent of schools in such manner as the Superintendent of Public Instruction may provide.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46012.

For purposes of any procedure for verification of absences from school, a student 18 years of age or over, with respect to his own absences from school, shall have all of the responsibilities and powers which, in the case of a minor, would be charged to the parent, guardian, or other person having charge or control of the minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.

(a) If there is an increase in actual student attendance of any school maintained by a school district to which Section 46013.7 has been made applicable, then an increase in the revenue limit of a school district shall be calculated as follows:

(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prescribe the manner in which actual student attendance is calculated.

(2) Divide the actual student attendance in the 1979–80 fiscal year by total enrollment in the 1979–80 fiscal year.

(3) Divide the actual student attendance in the current fiscal year by total enrollment in the current fiscal year.

(4) Subtract the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) from the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) Divide the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (4) by 0.02.

(6) If the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) is equal to or greater than one, then divide that quotient by 100.

(7) If the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) is less than one, then the district shall not be affected by the provisions of this section.

(8) Multiply the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph (6) by the revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance in the current fiscal year, and multiply that product by the total enrollment of the school which generated the increased actual student attendance. This is the amount by which revenue limit shall be increased.

(b) The revenue limit increase calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated as follows:

(1) If the school receives funds pursuant to either Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 44670) of Part 25 or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28, then one-half of the increase shall be added to such funds; the other half of the increase shall be added to the general fund of the district.

(2) If the school does not receive funds pursuant to either Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 44670) of Part 25 or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28, then one-half of the increase shall be used to initiate a program pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28 at the school; the other half of the increase shall be added to the general fund of the district. If a program is not initiated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28 within one year, then those funds shall be deposited in the general fund of the district and the apportionment of funds to the district from Section A of the State School Fund for the then current fiscal year shall be reduced by the same amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1329, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.7.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize 30 schools in 28 school districts to continue to use the attendance accounting and reporting procedures prescribed by Section 46013 for the 1985–86 school year through the 1993–94 school year, and shall not require these districts to keep parallel attendance accounting and reporting procedures as required under existing laws otherwise applicable. Subsequent to the 1982–83 fiscal year, no school district shall be eligible to receive a revenue limit increase pursuant to Section 46013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.

Pupils, with the written consent of their parents or guardians, may be excused from school in order to participate in religious exercises or to receive moral and religious instruction at their respective places of worship or at other suitable place or places away from school property designated by the religious group, church, or denomination, which shall be in addition and supplementary to the instruction in manners and morals required elsewhere in this code. Such absence shall not be deemed absence in computing average daily attendance, if all of the following conditions are complied with:

(a) The governing board of the district of attendance, in its discretion, shall first adopt a resolution permitting pupils to be absent from school for such exercises or instruction.

(b) The governing board shall adopt regulations governing the attendance of pupils at such exercises or instruction and the reporting thereof.

(c) Each pupil so excused shall attend school at least the minimum school day for his grade for elementary schools, and as provided by the relevant provisions of the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education for secondary schools.

(d) No pupil shall be excused from school for such purpose on more than four days per school month.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature that this section shall be permissive only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46015.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that pregnant and parenting pupils are entitled to accommodations that provide them with the opportunity to succeed academically while protecting their health and the health of their children. The Legislature hereby establishes the following accommodations as rights of pregnant and parenting pupils:

(1) A pregnant or parenting pupil is entitled to eight weeks of parental leave, which the pupil may take before the birth of the pupil’s infant if there is a medical necessity and after childbirth during the school year in which the birth takes place, inclusive of any mandatory summer instruction, in order to protect the health of the pupil who gives or expects to give birth and the infant, and to allow the
 pregnant or parenting pupil to care for and bond with the infant. It is the intent of the Legislature that the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, notify the school of the pupil’s intent to exercise this right. Failure to notify the school shall not abridge the rights established by this paragraph or any other right established by this subdivision.

(2) A pregnant or parenting pupil who does not wish to take all or part of the parental leave to which they are entitled pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be required to do so.

(3) A pregnant or parenting pupil is entitled to receive more than eight weeks of parental leave pursuant to paragraph (1) if deemed medically necessary by the pupil’s physician.

(4) When a pupil takes parental leave pursuant to paragraph (1), the supervisor of attendance shall ensure that absences from the pupil’s regular school program are excused until the pupil is able to return to the regular school program or an alternative education program.

(5) During parental leave taken pursuant to paragraph (1), a local educational agency shall not require a pregnant or parenting pupil to complete academic work or other school requirements.

(6) A pregnant or parenting pupil may return to the school and the course of study in which he or she was enrolled before taking parental leave pursuant to paragraph (1).

(7) Upon return to school after taking parental leave pursuant to paragraph (1), a pregnant or parenting pupil is entitled to opportunities to make up work missed during his or her
 leave, including, but not limited to, makeup work plans and reenrollment in courses.

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, a pregnant or parenting pupil may remain enrolled for a fifth year of instruction in the school in which the pupil was previously enrolled when it is necessary in order for the pupil to be able to complete state and any local graduation requirements, unless the local educational agency makes a finding that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(9) A pupil who chooses not to return to the school in which he or she was enrolled before taking parental leave pursuant to paragraph (1) is entitled to alternative education options offered by the local educational agency.

(10) In accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 221.51, a pregnant or parenting pupil who participates in an alternative education program shall be given educational programs, activities, and courses equal to those he or she would have been in if participating in the regular education program.

(11) A pupil shall not incur an academic penalty as a result of his or her use of the accommodations specified in this subdivision.

(b) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A local educational agency shall respond to a complaint filed pursuant to
 paragraph (1) in accordance with Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(4) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the department finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a school operated by a school district or a county office of education, a charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, or the California School for the Blind.

(2) “Pregnant or parenting pupil” means a pupil who gives or expects to give birth or a parenting pupil who has not given birth and who identifies as the parent of the infant.

(3) “Pupil” means a pupil enrolled in a local educational agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 942, Sec. 4.   (AB 2289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Attendance—Maximum Credit—Minimum Day [46100. - 46211.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [46100. - 46100.]

46100.

The governing board of each school district shall, subject to the provisions of this chapter, fix the length of the schoolday for the several grades and classes of the schools maintained by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Kindergarten and Elementary Schools [46110. - 46120.]

46110.

No pupil in a kindergarten or in any grade of an elementary school shall be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day and nothing in this article shall be construed to the contrary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46111.

(a) (1) A pupil in a kindergarten shall not be kept in school in any day more than four hours excluding recesses except for pupils in Early Primary Programs, as set forth in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 8970) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, kindergarten pupils in expanded learning opportunity programs intended to supplement instructional time provided by a school district pursuant to Section 46120, and pupils participating in an attendance recovery program pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 46210).

(2) A pupil in a kindergarten in a school operating on a program of multitrack year-round scheduling pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 37670 may be kept in school on any day for 265 minutes of instruction, excluding
 recesses.

(b) This section shall not apply to the Pasadena Unified School District or counties of the third class as determined pursuant to Section 28024 of the Government Code, as it read on January 1, 1977.

(c) This section shall not apply to the San Bernardino Unified School District with regard to any pupil of that district who is determined by the principal of the school in which that pupil is enrolled, pursuant to testing, teacher recommendation, or both, to be developmentally and academically suited for the longer instructional day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 43.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

46112.

The minimum schoolday in grades 1, 2, and 3 in elementary schools, except in opportunity schools, classes, or programs, is 230 minutes, except where the governing board of a school district has prescribed a shorter length for the schoolday because of lack of school facilities which requires double sessions, in which case the minimum schoolday in such grades shall be 200 minutes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46113.

The minimum schoolday in grades 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 in elementary schools and in special day and evening classes of an elementary school district, except in opportunity schools, classes, or programs, is 240 minutes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46114.

(a) The minimum schoolday in grades 1, 2, and 3 in elementary schools may be computed by determining the number of minutes of attendance in any 10 consecutive schooldays and dividing that number by 10. If the resulting quotient is 230 or more, the pupils shall be deemed to have complied with Section 46112, even if the number of minutes attended in any one schoolday is less than 230, but not less than 170.

(b) The minimum schoolday in grades 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 in elementary schools may be computed by determining the number of minutes of attendance in any 10 consecutive schooldays and dividing that number by 10. If the resulting quotient is 240 or more, the pupils shall be deemed to have complied with Section 46113, even if the number of minutes attended in any one schoolday is less than 240, but not less than 180.

(c) The minimum schoolday in kindergarten in elementary schools may be computed by determining the number of minutes of attendance in any 10 consecutive schooldays and dividing that number by 10. If the resulting quotient is 180 or more, pupils shall be deemed to have complied with Section 46117, even if the number of minutes attended in any one schoolday is less than 180, but not less than 60.

No computation authorized by this section shall result in any increase in state apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective June 16, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

46115.

The minimum schoolday in kindergartens and in grades 1 to 8, inclusive, in elementary schools, is exclusive of noon intermissions and, except in kindergartens, exclusive of recesses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46117.

The minimum schoolday for pupils in kindergartens is 180 minutes inclusive of recesses, and no units of average daily attendance shall be credited for attendance in kindergarten classes if the minimum schoolday of such classes is less than 180 minutes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46118.

A single-session kindergarten class shall meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The class is maintained for a minimum of 180 minutes per schoolday.

(b) The kindergarten class teacher is assigned to only one session of kindergarten daily as a principal teacher.

(c) The kindergarten teacher is a full-time certificated employee.

(d) The kindergarten teacher shall be available for assistance or assignment in the instructional program of the primary grades when not involved in the kindergarten program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1093, Sec. 14.5.)
-------------------------------------------

46119.

The governing board of a school district which has fewer than 40 pupils enrolled in kindergarten classes may make application to the Superintendent of Public Instruction requesting approval to maintain two kindergarten classes of 150 minutes each inclusive of recesses on the same day which are taught by the same teacher. The average daily attendance for such classes shall be adjusted by a multiplication factor of 0.500.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

46120.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that all local educational agencies offer all unduplicated pupils in classroom-based instructional programs access to comprehensive after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities.

(2) The Expanded Learning Opportunities Program is hereby established.

(b) (1) For the 2021–22 and 2022–23 school years, local educational agencies that receive funds pursuant to subdivision (d) shall offer to at least all unduplicated pupils in classroom-based instructional programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and provide to at least 50 percent of enrolled unduplicated pupils in classroom-based
 instructional programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, access to expanded learning opportunity programs. Funding received pursuant to this section for the 2021–22 and 2022–23 school years shall be expended to develop an expanded learning opportunity program or provide services in accordance with program requirements.

(2) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, as a condition of receipt of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), local educational agencies shall offer to all pupils in classroom-based instructional programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, access to expanded learning opportunity programs, and shall provide access to any pupil whose parent or guardian requests their placement in a program.

(3) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, as a condition of receipt of funds allocated pursuant to
 subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), local educational agencies shall offer to at least all unduplicated pupils in classroom-based instructional programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, access to expanded learning opportunity programs, and shall provide access to any unduplicated pupil whose parent or guardian requests their placement in a program.

(4) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, as a condition of receipt of funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), expanded learning opportunity programs shall include all of the following:

(A) On schooldays, as described in Section 46100 and Sections 46110 to 46119, inclusive, and days on which school is taught for the purpose of meeting the 180-instructional-day offering as described in Section 46208 for school districts and the 175-instructional-day offering as described in Section
 11960 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for charter schools, in-person before or after school expanded learning opportunities that, when added to daily instructional minutes, recess, and meals, are no fewer than nine hours of combined instructional time, recess, meals, and expanded learning opportunities per instructional day.

(B) (i) For at least 30 nonschooldays, inclusive of extended school year days provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56345, no fewer than nine hours of in-person expanded learning opportunities per day.

(ii) Extended school year days may include in-person before or after school expanded learning opportunities that, when added to daily instructional minutes, recess, and meals, are not fewer than nine hours of combined instructional time, recess, meals, and expanded learning opportunities per
 instructional day.

(C) For expanded learning opportunity programs located in a frontier designated geographical location, program requirements are no fewer than eight hours of combined instructional time, recess, meals, and in-person before or after school expanded learning opportunities per instructional day, and no fewer than eight hours of in-person expanded learning opportunities on at least 30 nonschooldays.

(5) Local educational agencies operating expanded learning opportunity programs pursuant to this section may operate a before school component of a program, an after school component of a program, or both the before and after school components of a program, on one or multiple schoolsites, and shall comply with subdivisions (c), (d), and (g) of Section 8482.3, including the development of a program plan based on all of the following:

(A) The department’s guidance.

(B) Section 8482.6.

(C) Paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, and paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) of Section 8483.3.

(D) Section 8483.4, except that programs serving transitional kindergarten or kindergarten pupils shall maintain a pupil-to-staff member ratio of no more than 10 to 1.

(6) Local educational agencies shall prioritize services provided pursuant to this section at schoolsites in the lowest income communities, as determined by prior year percentages of pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals, while maximizing the number of schools and neighborhoods with expanded learning opportunity programs across their attendance area.

(7) Local educational agencies may serve all pupils, including elementary, middle, and secondary school pupils, in expanded learning opportunity programs provided pursuant to this section.

(8) Local educational agencies may charge pupil fees for expanded learning opportunity programs provided pursuant to this section, consistent with Section 8482.6.

(9) Local educational agencies are encouraged to collaborate with community-based organizations and childcare providers, especially those participating in state or federally subsidized childcare programs, to maximize the number of expanded learning opportunity programs offered across their attendance areas.

(10) This section does not limit parent choice in choosing a care provider or program for their child
 outside of the required instructional minutes provided during a schoolday. Pupil participation in an expanded learning opportunity program is optional. Children eligible for an expanded learning opportunity program may participate in, and generate reimbursement for, other state or federally subsidized childcare programs, pursuant to the statutes regulating those programs.

(11) Local educational agencies may provide up to three days of staff development during regular expanded learning opportunity program hours.

(12) For a local educational agency that is temporarily prevented from operating its expanded learning opportunity program because of a school or program site closure due to emergency conditions listed in Section 41422 or subdivision (d) of Section 8482.8, and is not able to meet all of the requirements pursuant to paragraph (1), which is in fact shown by a resolution
 adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency, in addition to documentation substantiating the need for closure, the local educational agency shall not be subject to the penalty required pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c) as a result of the emergency.

(13) (A) An expanded learning opportunity program shall not be required to comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 or the requirements set forth in Chapter 19 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, an expanded learning opportunity program operating pursuant to this section may operate without obtaining a child daycare facility license or special permit pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, and Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. An expanded learning opportunity program shall not receive any additional funding pursuant to this subparagraph.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), an expanded learning opportunity program operated by a third party that holds a child daycare facility license or special permit pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, as of June 1, 2023, shall maintain that license or permit capacity as a requirement of contracting pursuant to this section until June 30, 2025. An expanded learning opportunity program shall not receive any additional funding pursuant to this subparagraph.

(D) Nothing in this section exempts an expanded learning opportunity program operating pursuant to this section from
 complying with the child daycare facility license requirements set forth in Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code when serving children who do not participate in the After School Education and Safety Program (Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1), 21st Century Community Learning Centers (Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1), or the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program pursuant to this section. If multiple funding sources are used to serve pupils in an expanded learning opportunity program, a conflict in program requirements shall be resolved in favor of the funding source with the stricter requirements.

(c) (1) (A) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, a local educational agency
 shall be subject to the audit conducted pursuant to Section 41020 to determine compliance with subdivision (b).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, a local educational agency that received funding pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) in the prior applicable fiscal year, and receives funding pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) in the current applicable fiscal year, shall be subject to the audit conducted pursuant to Section 41020 to determine compliance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) for that current applicable fiscal year only and, for each fiscal year thereafter, shall be subject to an audit to determine compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, if a local educational agency either fails to offer or provide access to
 expanded learning opportunity programs to eligible pupils pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall withhold from the local educational agency’s apportionment of funds pursuant to subdivision (d) an amount proportionate to the number of pupils to whom the local educational agency failed to offer or provide access to expanded learning opportunity programs. Pupils opting not to participate in the expanded learning opportunity program shall not generate a penalty for a local educational agency pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) (A) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, if a school district fails to maintain the required number of days or hours described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s apportionment of funds pursuant to subdivision (d), as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (2), an amount
 equal to the product of 0.0048 times the school district’s apportionment for each day the school district fails to meet the day or hour requirements.

(B) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, if a charter school fails to maintain the required number of days or hours described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall withhold from the charter school’s apportionment of funds pursuant to subdivision (d), as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (2), an amount equal to the product of 0.0049 times the charter school’s apportionment for each day the charter school fails to meet the day or hour requirements.

(d) (1) The Superintendent shall allocate funding appropriated in Item 6100-110-0001 of the annual Budget Act and in subdivision (h), if applicable, in the following manner:

(A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, for local educational agencies with a prior fiscal year local control funding formula unduplicated pupil percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 of equal to or greater than 80 percent, the amount of one thousand one hundred seventy dollars ($1,170) per unit of the local educational agency’s prior fiscal year second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, classroom-based average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage. Prior fiscal year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(B) For the 2022–23 to 2024–25 fiscal years, inclusive, for local educational agencies with a prior fiscal year local control funding formula unduplicated
 pupil percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 of equal to or greater than 75 percent, the amount of two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750) per unit of the local educational agency’s prior fiscal year second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, classroom-based average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage. Prior fiscal year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(C) Commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, for local educational agencies with a prior fiscal year local control funding formula unduplicated pupil percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 of equal to or greater than 55 percent, the amount of two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750) per unit
 of the local educational agency’s prior fiscal year second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, classroom-based average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage. Prior fiscal year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(D) For all other local educational agencies not receiving an allocation under subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), the amount of funds remaining from the appropriations in Item 6100-110-0001 of the annual Budget Act and subdivision (h), if applicable, after the amount allocated pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), shall be allocated on a per-unit basis of the local educational agency’s prior year second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, classroom-based average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s
 unduplicated pupil percentage. Prior year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year. The per-unit rate pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed the per-unit rate pursuant to subparagraph
 (C), and, commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, shall not be less than a per-unit rate of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800).

(E) For purposes of allocating funding pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) for the 2025–26 fiscal year only, the Superintendent shall calculate the difference between the prior fiscal year average daily attendance from the first period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and the second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and, if there is a difference, allocate to the applicable local educational agency the amount of that difference attributable to the following local educational agencies:

(i) Marquez Charter, Palisades Charter Elementary, and Palisades Charter High within the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(ii) Aveson Global Leadership Academy, Aveson School of Leaders, Odyssey Charter, OCS - South, and Pasadena Rosebud Academy in the Pasadena Unified School District.

(iii) Alma Fuerte Public in the City of Pasadena.

(iv) The Los Angeles Unified School District and the Pasadena Unified School District.
